translit/remove_stresses.lexd
PATTERNS
(Alphabet|Cleanup)*

LEXICON Cleanup
́: # remove stress

LEXICON Alphabet
a
ā
b
v
w
g
ɣ
ɣ̌
d
δ
ð
e
ê
ž
z
ӡ
ӡ
ʒ
Ʒ
i
y
ī
ī
k
q
l
m
n
o
p
r
s
t
θ
ϑ
u
ū
ů
f
x
x̌
h
c
č
š
ǰ
ǰ
а
ā
б
в
w
г
ғ
ɣ̌
д
δ
δ
е
ê
ж
з
ȥ
ӡ
ӡ
Ӡ
и
й
ӣ
ӣ
к
қ
л
м
н
о
п
р
с
т
θ
θ
у
ӯ
у̊
ф
х
х̌
ҳ
ц
ч
ш
ҷ
ҷ
